Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1618.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DULUTH PROMISE.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of economic development for a grant to Duluth Public Schools for the Duluth Promise initiative to strengthen career planning, career pathway training and education, wraparound support services, and job skills advancement in high-demand careers including health care, manufacturing, and business finance. The Duluth Promise aims to reduce barriers to employment and address workforce shortages in the Duluth area and St. Louis County by building intentional strategies with employers, kindergarten through grade 12 students, and higher education partners. Money appropriated under this section: new text end new text begin (1) shall be focused on establishing clear pathways with early college credit, credit for prior learning, college in the schools, early work experiences, and earn-and-learn opportunities; new text end new text begin (2) shall support employer outreach services to solve current and anticipated workforce challenges and be directly connected to workforce programming; and new text end new text begin (3) may be used for program expenses, including but not limited to hiring instructors and navigators, space rental, and supportive services to help participants attend classes. new text end new text begin These appropriations are onetime and are available until June 30, 2027. new text end